apertium-niv.niv.lexd
LEXICON NounRoot-Sakh
ванивӈ:ванивӈ       # warrior, soldier
вер̌кинивӈ:вер̌кинивӈ # seller
вонӈ:вонӈ           # inhabitant, villager
ёӄо:ёӄо             # Yakut
ёӄоӈ:ёӄоӈ           # Yakut
ётнивӈ:ётнивӈ       # tailor
ётр̌аӈӷ:ётр̌аӈӷ       # seamstress
иврыр̌аӈӷ:иврыр̌аӈӷ   # cleaner, janitor (female)
кʼилӈ:к{ʼ}илӈ       # Evenk
кʼуғи:к{ʼ}уғи       # Ainu (person)
кʼынивӈ:к{ʼ}ынивӈ   # jack of all trades; craftsman, artisan
ӄʼа:ӄ{ʼ}а           # name (given or family)
ӄʼатьӈ:ӄ{ʼ}атьӈ     # tribe, people, breed, type, kind, race, sort, example
лазивинивӈ:лазивинивӈ # passerby
лепр̌анивӈ:лепр̌анивӈ # baker
лернивӈ:лернивӈ     # artist
лаўлаўк:лаўлаўк     # argumentative person, debater
нивӈ:нивӈ           # person
ниғвӈ:ниғвӈ         # Nivkh
нивғӈ:нивғӈ         # Nivkh
лотинивӈ:лотинивӈ   # Russian (person)
лоти:лоти           # Russian
лотя:лотя           # Russian
меньвонивӈ:меньвонивӈ # helmsman, driver
мраӈилак:мраӈилак   # lazybones, slacker, loafer, idler
мрынивӈ:мрынивӈ     # swimmer
момр̌:момр̌           # slob, messy/unkempt person
мувонивӈ:мувонивӈ   # boatman, boater
мынивӈ:мынивӈ       # listener, audience
ӈаӈанғк:ӈаӈанғк     # hunter
ӈарлак:ӈарлак       # fat person, fatty
ӈафӄр̌аӈӷ:ӈафӄр̌аӈӷ   # female friend
р̌аӈӷ:р̌аӈӷ           # woman
орӈар̌:орӈар̌         # Orok, Uilta
палӈатӈунивӈ:палӈатӈунивӈ # woodsman, forest ranger
пес:пес             # nurse, nanny
питғыӈдаюнивӈ:питғыӈдаюнивӈ # writer, author
питғыӈурунивӈ:питғыӈурунивӈ # reader
полмк:полмк         # blind person
пʼезмулак:п{ʼ}езмулак # egomaniac
пʼр̌ынивӈ:п{ʼ}р̌ынивӈ # newcomer, stranger
руғнивӈ:руғнивӈ     # voter, elector; sorter
тяӈги:{Ч}{ь}аӈги    # boss
тʼаӈрк:т{ʼ}аӈрк     # trickster, dodger (ловкач)
ӽанивӈ:ӽанивӈ       # shooter, rifleman
уғмунивӈ:уғмунивӈ   # champion, hero
ӿиўлак:ӿиўлак       # добытчик (miner, hunter, fisherman (i.e. extractor); breadwinner)
чолак:чолак         # pauper, poor man
уғмунивӈ:уғмунивӈ   # champion, hero
чоӈанғк:чоӈанғк     # fisherman
ызӈ:ызӈ             # owner
эзмулак:эзмулак     # favorite
эньӄӈард:эньӄӈард   # thief, robber
янд:янд             # Nanai
ясӄнивӈ:ясӄнивӈ     # tailor('s assistant)
хитук:хитук         # tailor('s assistant)
ятӈунивӈ:ятӈунивӈ   # watchman, guard
ави:ави             # pharynx
авлых:авлых         # lip
ағри:ағри           # saliva
алми:алми           # palate (of mouth)
амх:амх             # mouth
анғи:анғи           # heel
аў:аў               # voice
аф:а{ф}             # moustache, beard
ух:ух               # nose
вих:вих             # Dir/LR
илх:илх             # gum(s) (around teeth)
илх:илх             # buckskin
иты:иты             # chin, jaw, jowl     ! it's ити in the picture book, иты in the blue thematic dictionary
кыдр:кыдр           # back, spine
кыр̌:кыр̌             # umbilical cord
кʼиғуф:к{ʼ}иғу{ф}   # bladder
кʼылмр̌:к{ʼ}ылмр̌     # belly button, navel
кʼур̌:к{ʼ}ур̌         # gut, intestine
ӄорӄор̌:ӄорӄор̌       # throat
ӿесӄр̌:ӿесӄр̌         # throat
ӄʼос:ӄ{ʼ}ос         # neck
нос:нос 	          # ear
мла:мла 	          # ear
мыньк:мыньк         # breast (woman's)
нетф:нет{ф}         # face
ӈыньк:ӈыньк         # face
оск:оск             # face
ниви:ниви           # birthmark
нисаӽ:нисаӽ         # tear (from eye)
носых:носых         # earlobe
няӽ:няӽ 	          # eye, (pair of) eyes    ! plural is multiple pairs of eyes
ӈазл:ӈазл           # foot; sole
ӈағс:ӈағс           # tooth
ӈағзыр̌:ӈағзыр̌       # Dir/LR
эмс:эмс             # tooth
эмз:эмз             # Dir/LR
ӈаӻри:ӈаӻри         # shoulder
ӈазр̌:ӈазр̌           # vein; skin from an animal's paw; trim on a ski from an animal's paw
ӈай:ӈай             # thigh, hip
ӈайн:ӈайн           # cheek(bone)
ӈайрам:ӈайрам       # rib
ӈайрым:ӈайрым       # rib
ӈалр̌:ӈалр̌           # kidney
ӈамх:ӈамх           # hair, fur, wool, pile (in the hair sense)
ӈаньғыф:ӈаньғы{ф}   # bone
ӈаньғф:ӈаньғ{ф}     # Dir/LR
ӈарғыр̌:ӈарғы{ф}     # chest
ӈар̌ӄи:ӈар̌ӄи         # epidermal ridges (those rounded lines on your fingertip)
ӈаски:ӈаски         # backbone, spine; (mountain) ridge; ceiling beam
ӈатьх:ӈатьх         # leg, paw (also leg of an object, like a table)
ӈаўр̌:ӈаўр̌           # belly (tummy)
ӈаўр̌к:ӈаўр̌к         # brain
ӈиф:ӈи{ф}           # heart
ӈым:ӈым             # peritoneum
оӻри:оӻри 	        # nape, occiput
ол:ол               # armpit
пелад:пелад         # bile
тʼвир̌к:т{ʼ}вир̌к     # bile
пихӈаньғыф:пихӈаньғы{ф} # kneecap
пихты:пихты         # knee
поп:поп             # bun (of hair), ponytail
р̌ағунд:р̌ағунд       # mark (on body); decoration
такань:такань       # fingernail, toenail, claw, talon
такнь:такнь         # Dir/LR
тамк:тамк           # hand
тёӈр̌:{Ч}{ь}оӈр̌      # head
тивр̌:тивр̌           # liver
тоӈӄ:тоӈӄ           # elbow
тоӈр̌:тоӈр̌           # tendon; twins (a pair of?)
тот:тот             # forearm
туньм:туньм         # finger
тыӈ:тыӈ             # lens (of eye)
тяви:{Ч}{ь}ави      # stomach
тʼа:т{ʼ}а 	        # pate, crown of head
тʼаӻр̌:т{ʼ}аӻр̌       # bridge of nose
тʼаӻр̌:т{ʼ}аӻр̌       # chipmunk              ! should these be listed separately?
тʼадм:т{ʼ}адм 	    # top/back of the head, from pate to nape
тʼах:т{ʼ}ах	        # forehead
тʼу:т{ʼ}у 	        # joint (in body)
тʼу:т{ʼ}у 	        # sled                  ! should these be listed separately?
тʼыӈ:т{ʼ}ыӈ         # fontanelle (soft spot of baby head)
тʼытьк:т{ʼ}ытьк     # shin
ул:ул               # пазуха (sinus? bosom?)
унь:унь             # waist, pelvis
ӿаваф:ӿава{ф}       # lungs (a set probably)
ӿал:ӿал             # skin (human)
ӿеғми:ӿеғми 	      # temple (of head)
ӿеми:ӿеми   	      # Dir/LR
ӿивр̌:ӿивр̌           # back of hand
ӿилх:ӿилх           # tongue
ӿут:ӿут             # torso, body; dermis
ут:ут               # torso, body; dermis
чаӄрд:чаӄрд         # eye afflicted with leucoma (i.e. albugo)
чалм:чалм           # palm (of hand)
чоӽ:чоӽ             # blood, sap, berry juice, resin, pitch, tar
чхуф:чхуф           # fist
чхывр̌:чхывр̌         # eyebrow, eyebrows (a pair of them?)
эўр̌:эўр̌             # поясница (waist, loins, small of the back?)
выри:выри           # sore (on body)
заф:з{ь}а{ф}        # bruise (синяк)
кесӄф:кесӄ{ф}       # burn, scorch
ӄмазнд:ӄмазнд       # sickness, disease (especially of the eye?)
ӿуньд:ӿуньд         # sickness, disease (especially of the eye)
ӄолаф:ӄола{ф}       # part of the body stricken/afflicted by disease; ill health, ailment, malady, sickness, disease
ӄʼавр̌:ӄ{ʼ}авр̌       # hot-water bottle
лилр̌:лилр̌           # phlegm, mucus
лолӄ:лолӄ           # pus
ӈарзаф:ӈарза{ф}     # bruise (кровоподтёк)     ! how is this different from заф?
орӈоӽт:орӈоӽт       # medicinal rhizome of an edible grass
оӽт:оӽт             # medicine
поку:поку           # hump, hunch
вань:вань           # kettle
ӄанӈ:ӄанӈ           # doggo
таф:та{ф}           # house
ӿаймӈар̌:ӿаймӈар̌     # old man
мурӈ:мурӈ           # horse
чо:чо               # fish
таӽ:таӽ             # epidemic
тиӈ:тиӈ             # strength
тыӈз:тыӈз           # weight
тюкуд:{Ч}{ь}укуд    # appearance/manifestation of a food allergy
тʼый:т{ʼ}ый         # dream
тʼыф:т{ʼ}ы{ф}       # tumor; swollen place   ! The grammar will generate this, but how to get 'tumor' without listing it separately in the lexicon?
ӽана:ӽана           # (common) cold, chill
ӽар̌ӄавф:ӽар̌ӄавф     # abrasion, scrape
ваӄи:ваӄи           # box, trunk, chest
ваӄей:ваӄей         # Dir/LR
ваӄай:ваӄай         # Dir/LR
сета:сета           # sugar
ойдым:ойдым         # baby
тяӄо:{Ч}{ь}аӄо      # knife
эӻлӈ:эӻлӈ            # child
чатьф:чатьф         # bog, swamp
му:му               # boat
аки:аки             # older brother
атик:атик           # younger sibling
асӄ:асӄ             # Dir/LR
нанӽ:нанӽ           # older sister
атим:атим           # grandmother
аткытьх:аткытьх     # grandfather
ӈафӄ:ӈафӄ           # friend
леп:леп             # bread
лар̌ӄ:лар̌ӄ           # shirt, dress, gown
кʼеӄ:к{ʼ}еӄ         # fox
тур̌:тур̌             # meat
ӈойӄ:ӈойӄ           # egg
олӻоӈ:олӻоӈ          # pig, hog, boar
паньх:паньх         # soup
оӻроф:оӻро{ф}        # sable
паӽ:паӽ             # stone, rock
толф:тол{ф}         # summer
ма:ма               # dried fish
кʼеӈ:к{ʼ}еӈ         # sun
кер̌ӄӈ:кер̌ӄӈ         # sea
пʼирӈыр̌:п{ʼ}ирӈыр̌   # sazan (kind of carp)
теӈи:теӈи           # pink salmon      ! {Ч}{ь}?
чуғӈи:чуғӈи         # walrus
туӈ:туӈ             # sea lion
таўғур̌:таўғур̌       # bearded seal
тавӻай:тавӻай        # crab
поми:поми           # dolphin
кʼузр̌:к{ʼ}узр̌       # wolverine
лаӄр̌:лаӄр̌           # squirrel
ӿоло:ӿоло           # squirrel
ӿолу:ӿолу           # Dir/LR
лиғр̌:лиғр̌           # wolf
мем:мем             # monkey
мемӈ:мемӈ           # Dir/LR
чхыф:чхы{ф}         # bear
тʼоӽ:т{ʼ}оӽ         # moose
тʼор̌ӄ:т{ʼ}ор̌ӄ       # badger
тʼлығи:т{ʼ}лығи     # lynx
тʼлаӈи:т{ʼ}лаӈи     # (rein)deer
чоӻ:чоӻ             # fang, tusk
чоӻ:чоӻ             # flock, herd, pack      ! should these be listed separately?
авсӄ:авсӄ          # ruff, ruffe (fish)
ар̌ӄи:ар̌ӄи          # smelt (Osmerus: European smelt, pygmy smelt, rainbow smelt)
вел:вел            # summer chum/dog salmon (Oncorhynchus keta)
иўс:иўс            # pike (Esox)
ӄандё:ӄандё        # whitespotted char (Salvelinus leucomaenis)
ӄаӈи:ӄаӈи          # navaga; saffron cod (Eleginus)
лаӄи:лаӄи          # herring (Clupea)
пасӄи:пасӄи        # бычок - could be: 1) goby - any fish of the family Gobiidae OR 2) sculpin - any fish of the superfamily Cottoidea OR 3) bullhead - any fish of the suborder Scorpaenoidei OR 4) specifically the European bullhead / miller's thumb (Cottus gobio) in the suborder Scorpaenoidei
лойм:лойм          # trout
лоӄ:лоӄ            # flatfish: flounder, plaice, or sole
ласӄ:ласӄ          # бычок-каменушка (what is this?)
пʼар̌ӄ:п{ʼ}ар̌ӄ      # kaluga (Huso dauricus)
темраӈ:темраӈ      # rudd (Scardinius)              ! {Ч}{ь}?
ёниӈаӈ:ёниӈаӈ      # oak
кʼмый:к{ʼ}мый      # oak
ӿимӈ:ӿимӈ          # Siberian dwarf pine
тʼуск:т{ʼ}уск      # spruce (or fir?)
ӈарӈи:ӈарӈи        # fir
тевӻай:тевӻай       # maple (tree)                   ! {Ч}{ь}?
ӿивс:ӿивс           # birch
мускыр̌:мускыр̌      # poplar
ӄаӻӈ:ӄаӻӈ           # pine
олӽ:олӽ             # cane, rush, reed
орор̌:орор̌          # ginseng
оӻм:оӻм             # bark
ваӽ:ваӽ             # moss, lichen
ӈайӄ:ӈайӄ          # puppy
ар̌:ар̌              # male (animal)
аньӽ:аньӽ          # female (animal?)
кʼыск:к{ʼ}ыск      # cat (female)
эӻаӈ:эӻаӈ          # cow
чалу:чалу         # fog
лах:лах           # cloud
кʼлы:к{ʼ}лы       # sky
кыкык:кыкык       # swan


# ӷ ғ ӻ ӄ ӈ р̌ ӽ ӿ ʼ ў jjj ооо

ALIAS NounRoot-Amur NounRoot-Amur2
ALIAS NounRoot-Sakh NounRoot-Sakh2

LEXICON NUMBER
<sg>:>
<pl>:>{Г}у          # Dial/Amur
<pl>:>{Г}ун         # Dial/Sakh

LEXICON CASES
<nom>:>              # Nominative
<age>:>{a}ӽ          # Agentive     ! Dial/Amur
<comp>:>{y}к         # Comparative  ! Dial/Amur
<abl>:>{u}х          # Ablative     ! Dial/Amur
<dat>:>{R}оӽ         # Dative
 <dat>:>{R}ӽ          # Dir/LR
<term>:>{R}оӻо       # Terminative
 <term>:>{T}{ʼ}ыкы    # Dir/LR
 <term>:>{T}{ʼ}{X}а   # Dir/LR
<ins>:>{G}ир         # Instrumental
<loc>:>{u}{j}н       # Locative     ! just Amur?
<voc>:>{V}           # Vocative     ! just Amur?

<age>:>аӽ            # Agentive     ! Dial/Sakh
<comp>:>ак           # Comparative  ! Dial/Sakh
<abl>:>ух            # Ablative     ! Dial/Sakh

LEXICON CLITICS             # Amur for now
<qst>:>ла            # Y/N questions
<emph>:>{R}и         # intensifying particle 'even'
<emph>:>ӿагин        # intensifying particle 'even'
<foc>:>{R}а          # focus particle
<foc>:>ат            # focus particle
<part>:>ӿайра        # 'probably'
<itg_pej>:>ӿата      # used with an interrogative word, expresses displeasure/disapproval
